Utah statutes.
41-1a-606.   Method of giving notice -- Exceptions.
The method provided in Sections 41-1a-602 through 41-1a-605, for giving notice
of a lien or encumbrance upon a registered vehicle is exclusive except for
liens dependent upon possession and any lien or encumbrance filed as provided
under this chapter, which are exempt from the provisions of Section 70A-
9a-311, and other provisions of law that otherwise require or relate to the
recording or filing of instruments creating or evidencing title retention or
other liens or encumbrances upon vehicles of a type subject to registration
under this chapter.
